apertium-ur-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="ग/ऊ__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएँ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उओं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पौ/आ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कम/ी__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियाँ</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियों</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ऊ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उओं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जरद/ा__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऋ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हठ/ी__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियों</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियों</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गौ__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गेह/ूँ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुँओं</l>
          <r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="नकल__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ख/ाँ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाँ</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="वध/ू__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुएँ</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुयें</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुओं</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="बधू"><i>बध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="केंचुली"><i>केंचुल</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भ्रातावधू"><i>भ्रातावध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आजमाइश"><i>आजमाइश</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गऊ"><i>ग</i><par n="ग/ऊ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दगाबाजी"><i>दगाबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नकल"><i>नकल</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बुर्जुआ"><i>बुर्जु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वक्ता"><i>वक्ता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गफलत"><i>गफलत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शरारती"><i>शरारत</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शराबखोरी"><i>शराबखोर</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जरदा"><i>जरद</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अपमार्गी"><i>अपमार्ग</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आरण्यपशु"><i>आरण्यपशु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चालबाजी"><i>चालबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पौआ"><i>पौ</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बंधु"><i>बंधु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हकीकत"><i>हकीकत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रूसी"><i>रूस</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मालपूआ"><i>मालपू</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नववधू"><i>नववध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तफतीश"><i>तफतीश</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेमी"><i>प्रेम</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शुक्तिवधू"><i>शुक्तिवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हेमकर्ता"><i>हेमकर्ता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मियाँ"><i>मिय</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ताऊ"><i>ता</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कछुआ"><i>कछु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तरदाता"><i>उत्तरदाता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरात"><i>खैरात</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="संभरणमंत्री"><i>संभरणमंत्र</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कौआ"><i>कौ</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रोयाँ"><i>रोय</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लाला"><i>लाला</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पणी"><i>पण</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पतोहू"><i>पतोह</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="श्राद्धकर्ता"><i>श्राद्धकर्ता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मछुआ"><i>मछु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कुलवधू"><i>कुलवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जायका"><i>जायक</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्येष्ठाश्रमी"><i>ज्येष्ठाश्रम</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="भीडआ"><i>भीड</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खाँ"><i>ख</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गौ"><i>गौ</i><par n="गौ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वक्रचंचु"><i>वक्रचंचु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लोधी"><i>लोध</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="टिकाऊ"><i>टिका</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊ"><i></i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जलदाता"><i>जलदाता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनाफा"><i>मुनाफ</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खुशी"><i>खुश</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अँखुआ"><i>अँखु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="महाचमू"><i>महाचम</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तलुआ"><i>तलु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिजैविकी"><i>प्रतिजैविक</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सदननेता"><i>सदननेता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कमान"><i>कमान</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जोरू"><i>जोर</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तेँदुआ"><i>तेँदु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बंदगोभी"><i>बंदगोभ</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जनेऊ"><i>जने</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्फ"><i>बर्फ</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरियत"><i>खैरियत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कमी"><i>कम</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गलसुआ"><i>गलसु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पुत्रवधू"><i>पुत्रवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जंतु"><i>जंतु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाबाजी"><i>कलाबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्यवादी"><i>अन्यवाद</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आरजू"><i>आरज</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कीमा"><i>कीम</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शिक्षागुरु"><i>शिक्षागुरु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शराफत"><i>शराफत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बहू"><i>बह</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सुआ"><i>सु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गलतफहमी"><i>गलतफहम</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गेहूँ"><i>गेह</i><par n="गेह/ूँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लौ"><i>लौ</i><par n="गौ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हितवादी"><i>हितवाद</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
